Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-34] Additional powers; development.
Notwithstanding section 103-7, but with the approval of the governor, the
corporation may enter into and carry out agreements and undertake projects or
participate in projects authorized by this chapter. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next